Wyoming statutes. Title 11 Agriculture, Livestock and Other Animals
Chapter 15 Grading and Shipment of Potatoes

Cross references. —

As to definition of the term “director,” see §

11-1-101

.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

3 Am. Jur. 2d Agriculture § 2.

3 C.J.S. Agriculture § 3; 36A C.J.S. Food §§ 2, 4, 6 et seq.

§ 11-15-101.
Grades, classifications and standards.

In order to make the
grading and classification of potatoes uniform throughout the United
States, the director shall adopt by rule and grades, standards and
classifications for potatoes lawfully established by the United States
department of agriculture.

History.

Laws 1978, ch. 32, § 1; 1993, ch. 191, § 3.

§ 11-15-102.
Definitions.

As used in this act:

“Carlot” or “carload” means any railroad car, truck or trailer, regardless of size;

“This act” means W.S.

11-15-101

through

11-15-112

;

“Director” means the director of the department of agriculture.

History.

Laws 1978, ch. 32, § 1; 1993, ch. 191, § 3.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 11-15-103.
Sorting and grading.

Carlot shipments of potatoes
originating in Wyoming shall be sorted and graded at point of origin
upon request of a majority of the potato growers from the county making
shipments from any shipping points within the county as designated
by the director.

History.

Laws 1925, ch. 95, § 1; R.S. 1931, § 5-801; C.S. 1945, § 34-801; W.S. 1957, § 11-230; W.S. 1977, §

11-18-103

; Laws 1978, ch. 32, § 1; 1993, ch. 191, § 3.

§ 11-15-104.
Director to appoint inspectors; term.

This act shall be enforced
by qualified inspectors appointed by the director and licensed by
the United States department of agriculture. They shall keep their
licenses current and in good standing at all times when employed by
the director. They shall serve at the pleasure of the director.

History.

Laws 1925, ch. 95, § 4; R.S. 1931, § 5-804; C.S. 1945, § 34-804; W.S. 1957, § 11-231; W.S. 1977, §

11-18-104

; Laws 1978, ch. 32, § 1; 1993, ch. 191, § 3.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 11-15-102(a)(ii).

§ 11-15-105.
Conformity to applicable standards required; inspection; certificate,
use thereof as evidence.

No person shall pack, offer, consign or sell in carload lots any potatoes loaded within the state which do not conform to applicable standards, subject to such variations therefrom as provided by regulations adopted in accordance with this act, unless such potatoes are specifically described, or plainly marked, in accordance with regulations to indicate they are ungraded or unclassified.

Whenever grades, standards or classification have been established for potatoes, it is unlawful for any shipper to ship carload lots of potatoes without being inspected by an authorized inspector. The inspector shall issue a certificate of inspection showing grade, standard or other classification. The certificate shall be issued in duplicate, one (1) copy shall be attached to bill of lading and one (1) copy shall be issued to the shipper.

A certificate of the grade or other classification of potatoes, when not reversed or modified, shall be accepted in any court of this state as prima facie evidence of the true grade or classification of the potatoes at the time of grading or classification.

History.

Laws 1925, ch. 95, § 4; R.S. 1931, § 5-804; C.S. 1945, § 34-804; W.S. 1957, § 11-231; W.S. 1977, §

11-18-104

; Laws 1978, ch. 32, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 11-15-102(a)(ii).

§ 11-15-106.
Reports of inspections required.

The director shall make
reports to the United States department of agriculture on July 1 each
year.

History.

Laws 1925, ch. 95, § 4; R.S. 1931, § 5-804; C.S. 1945, § 34-804; W.S. 1957, § 11-231; W.S. 1977, §

11-18-104

; Laws 1978, ch. 32, § 1; 1993, ch. 191, § 3.

§ 11-15-107.
Director to promulgate regulations; board approval required.

Subject to approval of
the board of agriculture, the director may promulgate regulations
necessary to carry out the provisions of this act. The regulations
shall conform as nearly as practicable to any act of congress or standards
legally adopted by any federal agency relating to the marketing of
farm products.

History.

Laws 1925, ch. 95, § 4; R.S. 1931, § 5-804; C.S. 1945, § 34-804; W.S. 1957, § 11-231; W.S. 1977, §

11-18-104

; Laws 1978, ch. 32, § 1; 1993, ch. 191, § 3.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 11-15-102(a)(ii).

§ 11-15-108.
Director engaging in potato business prohibited.

The director is prohibited
from engaging in the business of buying, selling or commission dealing
in potatoes.

History.

Laws 1925, ch. 95, § 4; R.S. 1931, § 5-804; C.S. 1945, § 34-804; W.S. 1957, § 11-231; W.S. 1977, §

11-18-104

; Laws 1978, ch. 32, § 1; 1993, ch. 191, § 3.

§ 11-15-109.
Inspection upon request of interested party; issuance of certificate;
fees.

The director, upon request
of any interested party, may furnish a licensed inspector to inspect
any lot of potatoes within the state whether the potatoes originated
in Wyoming or elsewhere, and may issue a federal or state certificate
showing grade, quality and condition of such potatoes which will be
receivable as prima facie evidence in any court in Wyoming. This provision
includes storage, inspection and less than carload lots. For this
inspection the department shall be paid by the party asking for inspection
the fees established by the board of agriculture, not to exceed actual
costs of inspection and all traveling expenses to and from the place
of inspection.

History.

Laws 1925, ch. 95, § 4; R.S. 1931, § 5-804; C.S. 1945, § 34-804; W.S. 1957, § 11-231; W.S. 1977, §

11-18-104

; Laws 1978, ch. 32, § 1; 1993, ch. 191, § 3.

§ 11-15-110.
Reinspection on request; cost.

Any interested party
may demand a reinspection at point of origin if the grade established
by the licensed inspector is not satisfactory. The reinspection may
be made by an inspector authorized by the director or by an inspector
of the United States department of agriculture. The reinspection shall
be made at the expense of the party requesting the service.

History.

Laws 1925, ch. 95, § 4; R.S. 1931, § 5-804; C.S. 1945, § 34-804; W.S. 1957, § 11-231; W.S. 1977, §

11-18-104

; Laws 1978, ch. 32, § 1; 1993, ch. 191, § 3.

§ 11-15-111.
Inspection fees; exception; when inspection not required; consent
of director; certification of certain shipments.

A fee established by
the board of agriculture not to exceed actual costs of inspection
shall be paid on all shipments of potatoes inspected within the district
except those designated for manufacturing purposes on which no fee
shall be charged. With the consent of the director, potatoes for seed
stock may be moved to storage within the state without inspection.
When potatoes are shipped without inspection within the state the
shipper shall not be provided with a certificate. Other shipments
of seed stock must conform to the requirements of grade no. 1 except
with regard to size, and the certificate must contain a statement
designating variety, trueness to type and percent defects with regard
to disease and other blemishes.

History.

Laws 1925, ch. 95, § 5; R.S. 1931, § 5-805; C.S. 1945, § 34-805; W.S. 1957, § 11-232; W.S. 1977, §

11-18-105

; Laws 1978, ch. 32, § 1; 1993, ch. 191, § 3.

§ 11-15-112.
Prohibited acts; penalties.

Whoever removes any inspection
certificate before a car is entirely unloaded, or whoever except an
authorized inspector alters any inspection certificate, or whoever
without using reasonable diligence to secure inspection fails or neglects
to have potatoes inspected before shipping, or whoever hinders, molests
or attempts to influence any inspector in the performance of his duties,
or whoever violates this act is guilty of a misdemeanor and shall
be fined for each violation not exceeding five hundred dollars ($500.00)
and the costs of the prosecution, or shall be imprisoned not exceeding
six (6) months, or both. Any inspector who fails or neglects to perform
the duties imposed by this act shall suffer the penalty herein provided.

History.

Laws 1925, ch. 95, § 6; R.S. 1931, § 5-806; C.S. 1945, § 34-806; W.S. 1957, § 11-233; W.S. 1977, §

11-18-106

; Laws 1978, ch. 32, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 11-15-102(a)(ii).